src/hyphenation/hyphenation.xfscript
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian 
! Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================== !
! Hyphenator for Kildin Sámi !
! ========================== !

! standardized hyphenation for Kildin is desribed in
! @book{kuruc-etal1995,
!	Address = {Murmansk-Moskva},
!	Author = {Kuru\v{c}, Rimma Dmitrievna AND Nina Eliseevna Afanas'eva AND Iraida V. Vinogradova},
!	Call-Number = {MR},
!	Date-Added = {2007-10-26 15:58:44 +0200},
!	Date-Modified = {2008-08-22 13:08:21 +0200},
!	Keywords = {Kola Saami;Saami linguistics;Teaching material;Orthography},
!	Publisher = {{Murmanskij sektor lingvisti\v{c}eskich problem finno-ugorskich narodnostej Krajnego Severa Instituta Jazykoznanija Rossijsskoj Akademii nauk}},
!	Title = {Pravila orfografii i punktuacii saamskogo jazyka},
!	Year = 1995}
! as this book is roughly translated as "Kildin Saami orthographic rules" it  seems highly relevant to our work
! it describes Kurutch's reformed orthography (with һ --> ' (apostrophе) and ј --> ҋ)
! this reformed orthography has never been used in print, except in Kurutch's own teaching materials and Sammallahti's/Chvorostuchina's dictionary
! the two orthographic variants used in print are that of Kuruch's dictionary (1985, using һ and ј) and that of Kert's dictionary (1986, using хх and йх)
! since the differences between the three orthographic variants do not touch general orthographic principles, but concern almost exclusively the exchange of letters for two special sounds:
! Kert --> KurutchI --> KurutchII
! xx --> һ --> '
! йх --> ј --> ҋ
! we should use the forementioned "Kildin Saami orthographic rules" as a reference for our work on hyphenation (and even spell checkers)


echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

define Vow       [ a | á | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö |
                   A | Á | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö |
é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý
É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý 
а | е | и | о | у | я | э | ы | ё | ю | А | Е | И | О | У | Я | Э | Ы | Ё | Ю |
а̄ | е̄ | ӣ | о̄ | ӯ | я̄ | э̄ | ы̄ | ю̄ | А̄ | Е̄ | Ӣ | О̄ | Ӯ | Я̄ | Э̄ | Ы̄ | Ю̄ ] ;

define 2ndVow [ e | a | u | o | i | y | ø | E | A | U | O | I | Y | Ø ] ;

!define 3dVow [ u | U ] ;


define VowNot2ndVow   [ Vow - 2ndVow ] ;

!define VowNot3dVow   [ Vow - 3dVow ] ;


define U   [ u | U ] ;
define O   [ o | O ] ;
define A   [ a | A ] ;
define E   [ e | E ] ;
define I   [ i | I ] ;
define Y   [ y | Y ]  ;
define EO  [ e | E | o | O ] ;
define EOA [ e | E | o | O | a | A ] ;
define IAO [ i | I | a | A | o | O ] ;
define Oslash   [ ø | Ø ] ; ! Renamed from Ø to avoid non-ASCII chars
define UI  [ u | U | i | I ] ;


define IEdipht [ i e | I e | I E ] ;
define UOdipht [ u o | U o | U O ] ;
define EAdipht [ e a | E a | E A ] ;
define OAdipht [ o a | O a | O A ] ;
define OUdipht [ o u | O u | O U ] ;      ! jour-na-lis-sta
define AUdipht [ a u | A u | A U ] ;      ! fau-na, Lauv-sjø-vo-la, Kår-ve-jau-re ok.
define EUdipht [ e u | E u | E U ] ;      ! leut-nán-ta
define AEdipht [ a e | A e | A E ] ;      ! lae-sta-di-us,
define OslashYdipht [ ø y | Ø y | Ø Y ] ; ! nøyt-rála  ! Renamed from ØYdipht to avoid non-ASCII chars
define OEdipht [ o e | O e | O E ] ; ! goe-the
define IOslashdipht [ i ø | I ø | I Ø ] ; ! skiøld     ! Renamed from IØdipht to avoid non-ASCII chars
define IOdipht [ i o | I o | I O ] ; ! skiold, nation



!define EAUtripht [ e a u | E a u | E A U ] ; !Bor-deaux, Beau-fort
!define IEUtripht [ i e u | I e u | I E U ] ; !Nieu-siedler



define dipht [ IEdipht | UOdipht | EAdipht | OAdipht | OUdipht | AUdipht |
               EUdipht | AEdipht | OslashYdipht | OEdipht | IOslashdipht | IOdipht] ;

!define tripht [ EAUtripht | IEUtripht ] ;

define VowNotU      [ Vow - U   ] ;
define VowNotO      [ Vow - O   ] ;
define VowNotA      [ Vow - A   ] ;
define VowNotE      [ Vow - E   ] ;
define VowNotI      [ Vow - I   ] ;
define VowNotEO     [ Vow - EO  ] ;
define VowNotEOA    [ Vow - EOA ] ;
define VowNotIAO    [ Vow - IAO ] ;
define VowNotY      [ Vow - Y   ] ;
define VowNotOslash [ Vow - Oslash   ] ;  ! Renamed from VowNotØ to avoid non-ASCII chars
define VowNotUI     [ Vow - UI  ] ;


define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ |
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ |
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž |
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž |
             б | в | г | д | з | ж | й | к | л | ӆ | м | ӎ | н | ӊ |
             п | р | ҏ | с | т | х | ш | щ | ч | ф | ь | ъ ] ;

define S    [ S | s | Š | š 
            | С | с | Ш | ш | З | з | Ж | ж | Ч | ч | Щ | щ ] ;
define Cnss [ Cns - S ] ;
define Sgm  [ Cns | Vow ] ;


!define Cns [ Cnssymb | Vow i ] ;

echo << Rules>>

define beforedipht [..] -> %^ ||      Vow                    _ dipht ;  !a^ie, e^ao, o^uo, u^ea etc! Any diphth, bled by savetripht later on.
define nodipht     [..] -> %^ ||  Cns Vow                    _ VowNot2ndVow (Sgm) ; !e^å, e^ä etc
!define notripht   [..] -> %^ ||  Cns Vow     VowNot2ndVow   _ U (Sgm) ; ! Not needed?
define NotOslhYdi  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotOslash   _ Y (Sgm) ; !a^y, e^y etc
define NotOAdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotEO       _ A (Sgm) ; !i^a, u^a etc
define NotXUdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotEOA      _ U (Sgm) ; !y^u, i^u etc
define NotUOdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotUI       _ O (Sgm) ; !a^o, i^o etc
define NotIEdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotIAO      _ E (Sgm) ; !e^e, u^e etc
define NotIOslhdi  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotI   _ Oslash (Sgm) ; !i^a, i^u etc
define 4cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow r           _ d n j ,
                                 Vow Cns         _ s t r               Vow ,
                                 Vow     k s     _ p [ l | r | s | n ] Vow ,
                                 Vow n [ k | g ] _ s j                 Vow ; !gar^dnjil etc
define unvoiced    [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns)                         _ h [ n | m | l | j | r ] Vow ; !guv^hli
define unvoicedwg  [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns) h [ n | m | l | j | r ] _   [ n | m | l | j | r ] Vow ; !guvhl^li
define dissnas     [..] -> %^ || Vow         [ đ | i | l | r | v ] _ [ b m | d n (j) | g ŋ ] ; !ráv^dnji
! define palatal     [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns) Cns _ d j ,
!                                  Vow (Cns) Cns _ l j ,
!                                  Vow (Cns) Cns _ n j ,
!                                  Vow (Cns) Cns _ n j ,
!                                  Vow           _ n j ; !ád^djá etc
!                                 !, Vow     t   _ n j ; ! Redefining palatal as follows, look into this one!
define palatal     [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns) Cns _ d j ,
                                 Vow (Cns) Cns _ l j ,
                                 Vow (Cns) Cns _ n j ,
                                 Vow           _ n j ; !o^lju, bo^njan etc, removed: Vow _ d j , Vow  _ l j (causes o^ljju) , until we get decision from SGL
define s2cns       [..] -> %^ || Vow [ Cns | i ]            _ [s|š] Cnss Vow ; ! mái-stit (if commented out: máis-tit)
define s2cnswg     [..] -> %^ || Vow [ Cns | i ] [s|š] Cnss _ Cnss Vow ; !máist^tán
define 3cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow [ Cns | i ]       Cns  _ Cns Vow ; !biil^la
define foreign     [..] -> %^ || Vow                        _ g r Vow ; !para^gráfa
define xcns        [..] -> %^ || x                          _     Vow ; !sex^a
define 2cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow [ Cns | i ]            _ Cns Vow ; !áh^ku
define 1cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow                        _ Cns Vow ; !jo^ga


! The philosophy here is to remove some boundaries who, when seen also in a left
! context, are parts of triphthongs, and thus should not be divided. We do it
! via restoring, in order not to mess up our diphthong rules.

define savetripht  %^ -> 0 || e _ a u ;  ! does  work... !Bor-deaux, Beau-fort
define savetripht2 %^ -> 0 || i _ e u ;  ! does  work... !Nieu-siedler
define savetripht3 %^ -> 0 || i _ o u ;  ! does  work... !Sioux

define removedouble %^ -> 0 || %- _ ;
define removedouble2 %^ -> 0 || _ %- ;
define removedouble3 %# -> 0 || %- _ ;
define removedouble4 %# -> 0 || _ %- ;

echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [
!notripht
!.o.
beforedipht
.o. nodipht
.o. NotOslhYdi
.o. NotOAdipht
.o. NotXUdipht
.o. NotUOdipht
.o. NotIEdipht
.o. NotIOslhdi
.o. 4cns
.o. unvoiced
.o. unvoicedwg
.o. dissnas
.o. palatal
.o. s2cns
.o. s2cnswg
.o. 3cns
.o. foreign
.o. xcns
.o. 2cns
.o. 1cns
.o. savetripht
.o. savetripht2
.o. savetripht3
.o. removedouble
.o. removedouble2
.o. removedouble3
.o. removedouble4
 ] ;

echo <<Inverting...>>

invert net

! For quick compilation, comment the following line in:
!save h.fst ;
! Then, at the command line, give this command:
! xfst -utf8 < src/hyph-sme.txt
! As a result, a temporary h.fst file will be saved in sme/, it can be called
! with e.g. "lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 h.fst", or in a pipe.
